Utah statutes.
59-10-518.   Time for performance of acts when last day falls on Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

(1)  As used in this section, "legal holiday" means a legal holiday in this state.

(2)  Subject to Section 59-10-514, if the last day prescribed under authority of this chapter for performing any act falls on Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, the performance of the act shall be considered to be timely if it is performed on the next succeeding day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday.

(3)  For purposes of this section, the last day for the performance of any act shall be determined by including any authorized extension of time.

